Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-712.06
Public record; portion provided; when.

Any reasonably segregable public portion of a record shall be provided to the public as a public record upon request after deletion of the portions which may be withheld.

Laws 1979, LB 86, § 6.

In order for an agency to carry its burden before the district court, the agency must provide a reasonably detailed justification rather than conclusory statements to support its claim that the nonexempt material in a document is not reasonably segregable. State ex rel. BH Media Group v. Frakes, 305 Neb. 780, 943 N.W.2d 231 (2020).

The withholding of an entire document by an agency is not justifiable simply because some of the material therein is subject to an exemption. Agencies are required to disclose nonexempt portions of a document, unless those nonexempt portions are inextricably intertwined with exempt portions. State ex rel. BH Media Group v. Frakes, 305 Neb. 780, 943 N.W.2d 231 (2020).